Utah statutes.
7-9-9.   Amendment of articles of incorporation.
(1) The articles of incorporation may be amended at meetings of the
shareholders called for that purpose.
(2)  A notice of a meeting called for that purpose shall be given by mailing a
copy thereof to each member at least 10 days prior to the date of the meeting
or by giving notice as provided by the articles of incorporation and the
bylaws of the credit union. Notice of meetings shall contain the proposed
amendment.
(3)  A three-fourths vote of all members present shall be necessary to amend
the articles.
(4)  No amendment shall be made without the approval of the commissioner.
